Hawaii statutes.
[§11-412] Criminal prosecution.
(a) Any person who recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally violates any
provision of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who knowingly or intentionally
falsifies any report required by this part with the intent to circumvent the
law or deceive the commission or who violates section 11-352 or 11-353 shall be
guilty of a class C felony. A person charged with a class C felony shall not
be eligible for a deferred acceptance of guilty plea or nolo contendere plea
under chapter 853.

(c) A person who is convicted under this
section shall be disqualified from holding elective public office for a period
of four years from the date of conviction.

(d) For purposes of prosecution for violation
of this part, the offices of the attorney general and the prosecuting attorney
of the respective counties shall be deemed to have concurrent jurisdiction to
be exercised as follows:

(1) Prosecution shall commence with a written request
from the commission or upon the issuance of an order of the court; provided
that prosecution may commence prior to any proceeding initiated by the
commission or final determination;

(2) In the case of statewide offices, parties, or
issues, the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney for the city and
county of Honolulu shall prosecute any violation; and

(3) In the case of all other offices, parties, or
issues, the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney for the respective
county shall prosecute any violation.

In the commission's choice of prosecuting
agency, it shall be guided by whether any conflicting interest exists between
the agency and its appointive authority.

(e) The court shall give priority to the
expeditious processing of prosecutions under this section.

(f) Prosecution for violations of this part
shall not commence after five years have elapsed from the date of the violation
or date of filing of the report covering the period in which the violation
occurred, whichever is later.

(g) This section shall not apply to any person
who, prior to the commencement of proceedings under this section, has paid or
agreed to pay the fines prescribed by sections 11-340 and 11-391(b). [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Cited: 744 F. Supp. 2d 1075 (2010).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next